Tennessee, session 114, SB2213.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 65-5-114(c), is amended by deleting
"request" and substituting "request in writing".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2213
012220
- 1 -